Utah statutes.
35A-8-1802.   Interim study.

During the 2012 interim, the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee shall study and make recommendations to the Legislature regarding:

(1)  the effectiveness and progress of the Housing and Community Development's transition to the Department of Workforce Services;

(2)  housing needs in the state of Utah; and

(3)  opportunities for further consolidation of state programs and policies regarding housing.

